Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.340

Data-sharing agreements—When required.

(1) Before an agency shares with a contractor category 3 or higher data, as defined in policy established in accordance with RCW 43.105.054, a written data-sharing agreement must be in place. Such agreements shall conform to the policies for data sharing specified by the office of cybersecurity under the authority of RCW 43.105.054.

(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting audit authorities under chapter 43.09 RCW.

[ 2021 c 291 s 5.]